Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Devel-
opment, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Planning program ..................... $ 33,423,606
(2) Grant programs ........................ $ 11,002,894
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
(1) Planning program ..................... $ 2,720,817
(2) Grant programs ........................ $ 10,171,127
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,641,022 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department  of Land
Conservation and Development.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 2